New York, session 2025-2026, S8105.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Christopher P. Mayr, who is currently a retired member of the New York 3 State and local police and fire retirement system covered under section 4 384-e of the retirement and social security law, who for the period 5 beginning July 31, 1997 and ending August 28, 2004, was employed as a 6 fire fighter with the city of Rensselaer, county of Rensselaer, and who, 7 for reasons not ascribable to his own negligence, was not granted 8 service credit under section 384-d of the retirement and social securi- 9 ty law for such period of employment with the city of Rensselaer, shall 10 be granted such service credit under section 384-d of the retirement 11 and social security law and shall be entitled to the full rights and 12 benefits associated with coverage under such section as well as section 13 384-e of such law, provided that a request to that effect is filed with 14 the state comptroller within one year from the effective date of this 15 act. 16 § 2. All past service costs incurred in implementing the provisions of 17 this act shall be borne by the city of Rensselaer. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant Christopher P. Mayr, a retiree of the New York State and Local Police and Fire Retirement System, additional service credit for time worked as a fire fighter with the City of Rensselaer. If this bill is enacted during the 2025 Legislative Session, there will be an immediate past service cost of approximately $115,000 which EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11006-03-5 S. 8105 2 will be borne by the City of Rensselaer as a one-time payment. This estimate assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2026. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2024 was used in measuring the impact of the proposed change, the same data used in the April 1, 2024 actuari- al valuation. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2024 Report of the Actuary and the 2024 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2024 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The Market Assets and GASB Disclosures are found in the March 31, 2024 New York State and Local Retirement System Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the proposed change nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the professional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated May 15, 2025, and intended for use only during the 2025 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note No. 2025-131. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System, I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applica- ble Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member.